Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) There is established the Willamette Falls Locks Commission for the
purposes described in section  2 of this 2017 Act, consisting of 23 members appointed as fol-
lows:
(a) The Governor shall appoint:
(A) One member who is the  chair or a member of the Clackamas County Board of County
Commissioners, pursuant to a recommendation of the board;
Enrolled Senate Bill 256 (SB 256-A) Page 1
(B) One  member who is the chair or a member of the Marion County Board of County
Commissioners, pursuant to a recommendation of the board;
(C) One member who is the chair or  a member of the Yamhill County Board of County
Commissioners, pursuant to a recommendation of the board;
(D) One member who is the president  or a member of the governing body of the metro-
politan service district for the Portland metropolitan area, pursuant to a  recommendation
from the governing body;
(E) One member who is a representative of the Confederated Tribes of the  Grand Ronde
Community of Oregon, pursuant to a recommendation of the tribal council;
(F) One member who is a representative of a Columbia River tribe that is  a party to the
terms of a treaty of 1855 between the tribe and the United States of America;
(G) One member who is a representative of  the State Parks and Recreation Department;
(H) One member who is a representative of the Port of Portland;
(I) One member who is a representative of the Department of Transportation;
(J) One member  who is a representative of the Oregon Business Development Depart-
ment;
(K) Pursuant to a recommendation by that city’s governing body, one  member who is the
mayor or  a member of the governing body of each of the following cities, to represent the
cities’ interests in the Willamette Falls navigation canal and locks:
(i) The City of Oregon City;
(ii) The City of West Linn; and
(iii) The City of Wilsonville;
(L) One member to represent the collective interests of local  businesses and economic
development in Clackamas County, pursuant to a recommendation of the Clackamas  County
Board of County Commissioners;
(M) One member to represent the  collective interests of the tourism and recreation in-
dustries in  Clackamas County, pursuant to a recommendation by the Clackamas County
Board of County Commissioners;
(N) One member to represent the residents of Clackamas County, pursuant  to a recom-
mendation by the Clackamas County Board of County Commissions; and
(O) One member to represent an environmental or ecological nonprofit organization.
(b) The President of the Senate shall appoint  one member from among the members of
the Senate.
(c) The Senate Minority Leader shall appoint one member from  among the members of
the Senate.
(d) The Speaker of the House of  Representatives shall appoint two members from among
the members of the House of Representatives.
(e) The House Minority Leader shall appoint two members from among the members  of
the House of Representatives.
(2) The term of office of each member of the  commission appointed by the Governor is
four years, but a  member serves at the pleasure of the Governor. Before the expiration of
the term of  a member, the Governor shall appoint a successor whose term begins on January
1 of the following year. A member is eligible for reappointment.
(3) If  there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective for the unexpired term.
(4) Members of the commission are not  entitled to compensation and may not be reim-
bursed for travel or other expenses incurred by them  in the performance of their official
duties.
(5) Members  of the Legislative Assembly appointed to the commission are nonvoting
members of the commission and act in an advisory capacity only.
Enrolled Senate Bill 256 (SB 256-A) Page 2
(6) The commission shall select one of its members as chairperson  and another as vice
chairperson, for terms and with duties and powers necessary  for the performance of the
functions of the offices as the commission determines.
(7) The commission may elect an executive committee to consist  of three or more
members. The executive committee has and may exercise all authority of the commission.
(8) Official action by the  commission requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the commission.
(9)(a) The commission shall meet no less than six times per  year at times and places
specified by the call of the chairperson or of a majority of the voting members of the com-
mission. The commission shall include an opportunity for public comment as an item  on the
agenda of at least two meetings per year.
(b) The  commission shall notify federally recognized Indian tribes and known interested
parties of the dates and times of commission meetings.
(10) ORS 192.410 to 192.505 and 192.610 to 192.690 apply to the records  and meetings of the
commission.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Willamette Falls Locks Commission shall:
(a) Serve as a body to advise  state, local and regional government agencies on the de-
velopment and  implementation of state policies relating to the repair, reopening, operation
and maintenance of the Willamette Falls navigation canal and locks;
(b) Address issues relating to the  transfer of ownership, operation and financing of the
navigation canal and locks from a state, local and regional perspective;
(c) Make  recommendations for, and assist in coordination of, funding responsibilities,
including possible recommendations for the formation of an intergovernmental agreement
between state, local, regional and  federal agencies for the repair, reopening, operation and
maintenance of the navigation canal and locks;
(d) Investigate a framework for the ownership,  operations and management of the navi-
gation canal and locks;
(e) Negotiate ownership, operation and management of the navigation canal  and locks
with the United States Army Corps of Engineers;
(f) Communicate state policies relating to  the repair, reopening, operation and mainte-
nance of the navigation canal and locks to the Oregon Congressional Delegation; and
(g) Consider any other matters the commission considers necessary with respect to the
ownership and operation of the navigation canal and locks.
(2) The commission may establish advisory or technical committees  as the commission
considers necessary to aid and advise the commission  in the performance of its functions.
The committees may be continuing or temporary committees. The commission shall deter-
mine the representation, membership, terms  and organization of the committees and shall
appoint the members of the committees.
(3) Oregon Solutions at Portland State University shall  provide staffing and other re-
sources as required by the commission to carry out the duties of the commission.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Higher  Education Coordinating Commission, for the biennium beginning July 1,
2017, out of the General Fund, the amount  of $190,000, for distribution to Portland State
University for the purposes of sections 1 and 2 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 4. Sections 1 and 2 of this 2017 Act are repealed on December 31, 2023.
SECTION 5. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 256 (SB 256-A) Page 3
Passed by Senate July 3, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House July 7, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 256 (SB 256-A) Page 4